output/hyph-id-ml.pat.txt
.ab5akt
.aba3h
.aba4l
.aba4r
.abe5
.abs8
.abu4k
.acak3
.ad3io
.ada5t
.ado8n
.aduk3
.af3al
.af3r
.ag3r
.aga3h4
.aga4r
.ago5
.agro5
.ai3ra
.ai4s
.air2
.aja4
.ajak3
.ajar3
.ajo3
.ak3lo
.ak5r
.ak6ras
.aka3b
.aka4l7
.aka4n3
.aka6r5a
.akana5
.akanak8
.aktual8
.al2a
.ala3t
.ala4p
.ala5m
.alan5a
.alas3
.alem3
.alimu5
.alimun8
.alu5ta
.alut4
.am2a
.ama5ti
.ampa5r6
.amuk3
.an4a
.an7gin
.an8an
.andu5k
.ang8a
.angan5
.angge6
.angi7
.angka6l
.anja5l
.anjak5
.anta8ng
.anta8ran
.anyam5
.ap3l
.ap5r
.apu8n
.ar2a
.ara4k
.ara4m3
.ara8k5a
.arab8
.arka3
.aru5b
.as2a
.as3w
.as5int
.asa4m3
.asa5hi
.asul3
.at2a
.at3ud
.ato5n
.atu8
.au3t
.awa4r
.awi3
.aya2
.aya8k3
.ayum5
.ba3h4a
.ba3ki
.ba3r4a
.ba3t4a
.ba3ti
.ba5l4a
.ba5ng8a
.ba5ngi
.ba5ri
.ba5sa
.baba5t
.baka5r6
.balak8a
.bambang8
.bantar8
.bara7n
.barang8a
.batik5
.be3sa
.be4ra
.be5lan
.be5le
.be5li
.be6ria.
.be8rangi
.beba5l
.ber5al
.berang8a
.beras6a
.bi3h
.bi3sa
.bi5la
.bios5k
.bo3ha
.bo3ki
.bo3la
.bo3sa
.bo3t
.bo5si
.bri5sa
.bu1t
.bu3k8a
.bu3ni
.bu5la
.bu5ng8a
.ca3ki
.ca3p4a
.ca3ra
.car4
.cari8k5
.ce3ra
.ce5nga
.ci3l
.ci5nga
.co3l
.cu3ma
.cu3ti
.cu5l2
.cu5ra
.cua3t
.cup5l
.da3h4a
.da3hi
.da3ki
.da3m4a
.da3mi
.da5ri
.de3ka
.de5l4a
.de5ng8a
.de5ra
.debar5
.depa8k5
.dera8kan
.dera8s
.derak5
.di3e
.di3pa
.di3tr
.di5ka
.di5nga
.dip3l
.do3ka
.do3r4a
.do5la
.do5ng8a
.do5ri
.domin8
.du3ka
.du3pi
.ece2
.ef3l
.eg3r
.ek3l
.ek5r
.ek8sp
.eks5tr
.el2a
.elo1
.emana5
.embel5
.embi4
.embik5
.emi8gras
.ena2
.enak3
.endo8na
.era2
.era8n
.ere4
.ere8n
.erek3
.erot5a
.es5t
.eu5t
.faa3
.fi2r
.fi3la
.fotomet8
.ga3k
.ga3ma
.ga3r8a
.ga3ti
.ga5l4a
.ga5na
.ga5ng8a
.ga5ni
.ga5p4a
.galeng8
.gapu5
.gasa8
.gasak5
.gat4
.ge3t
.ge5l8
.ge5p8re
.genomi6
.gera8k5
.gi3r
.gi5na
.gi5s
.gi5t
.go3s
.go3t
.go8tr
.goi3
.gole5k8
.gu3la
.gu3p
.gu5li
.gu5ra
.gu5si
.guda7
.gudang8
.ha3s4a
.ha3ti
.hanta8r
.haya3
.hi3l
.ho3k
.ho3l8i
.hu1t
.ika4t3
.ika5p
.ikan3
.iku2
.ikur3
.ikut3
.ilat3
.imig3
.in2a
.in3ad
.in3ar
.in3ef
.in3er
.in3ok
.in3os
.in5gu.
.ing8i4
.injak5
.ir2a
.iri3t
.is5ent
.is5k
.ja1h2
.ja3m4a
.ja3p
.ja3r4a8
.ja5ba
.ja5l
.ja5mi
.ja5ng8a
.jala7
.jalang8a
.jarak5
.je5nga
.je5ra
.jelajah8
.ji3r
.jo3ra
.jo3t
.ju3ni
.ju5r4a
.juju5t
.ka3h4a
.ka3ki
.ka3p4a
.ka3r4a
.ka3t4a
.ka3ti
.ka5l4a
.ka5li
.ka5n4a
.ka5pi
.ka5ri
.ka7us
.kawa5s
.ke3sw
.ke3ta
.ke5li
.ke5na
.ke5r8a
.kel8a
.keras6a
.kesatri8
.ki1h
.ki3r4a
.ki5l2
.ki5n4a
.kia4s
.kik8
.ko3h
.ko3ki
.ko3la
.ko3ra
.ko5na
.ko5nga
.kop3l
.krasi6
.kro3n8
.ku3m4a
.ku3pi
.ku3ta
.ku3ti
.ku5l4a
.kut4
.kutuk5
.la1h2
.la3m4a
.la3pa
.la3ra
.la5ngi
.la5sa
.lanta8r
.lap2
.lari8k5
.lawa7
.lawang8
.le3s8a
.le5na
.le5ng8a
.le5ngo
.leba5r8
.lep5r
.li3ma
.li3p8a
.li3sa
.li5la
.li5n4a
.li5ni
.liku3
.limas5
.limun5
.lo3k4a
.lo3ki
.lo3ra
.lo3t
.lo5na
.lo5ng8a
.lu3p
.lu3ti
.lua7
.lua8r
.luang8
.ma3ir
.ma3ka
.ma3ni
.ma3pr
.ma3ra
.ma3ti
.ma5ki
.ma5lan
.ma5ng8a
.ma5san
.ma5t4a
.ma6lun.
.ma6nga.
.maja5k8
.mal4a
.manta5
.mas4a
.me5la
.mendag8
.menko5
.menkom8
.mer8a
.mer8i
.mi3ra
.mi7s4a
.mig3r
.mis5in
.mos3t
.mu5ka
.mu5n8a
.mu5ra
.mu5tan
.mut4
.na3hi
.na3i
.na3ut
.na5li
.na5pi
.neu5t
.ng4
.ng8a
.ng8e
.ng8i
.ng8o
.ng8u
.ni3s4a
.ni3t
.no2n
.no5ri
.nu3ta
.nu5ra
.nug5r
.nut2
.nut3r
.nya5ma
.ob1l
.ob8st
.oba2
.oda5
.odo3r
.odol5
.ok1l
.oka5
.olo2
.omo2
.on2a
.one8
.ong8o4
.ongol5
.op3l
.op3r
.opo3s
.ora4
.os3p
.os5t
.ose5a
.otak3
.oven3
.pa3ka
.pa3ma
.pa3r4a
.pa3s4a
.pa4us
.pa5li
.pa5ng8a
.pahem5
.palak5
.pe3ka
.pe3t4a
.pe5lan
.pe5te
.pe7ran
.pe8ratur
.peja5l
.peleng8a
.peli5k
.pem8ros
.per8inda
.per8undu
.perabu8k
.pi3ra
.pi8st
.pinggi8
.pla5no
.plato5
.platon8
.po3l4a
.po3ra
.po5lan
.poli3
.ponak5
.pu3ki
.pu3ti
.pu5l4a
.pu5n4a
.ra3p
.ra3r
.ra3s4a
.ra5ka
.rab8a
.rai3r
.rangi5
.rangin6
.rangka8k
.rara5
.rarang8
.re3gr
.re3ka
.re3s8a
.re3u
.re5nga
.rebus5
.rek5re
.rekons8
.ri3b
.ri5ng8a
.risik5
.ro3t2
.ros3t
.ru1t2
.ru3ha
.ru3ka
.sa3fa
.sa3h4a
.sa3hi
.sa3ki
.sa3la
.sa3m4a
.sa3r4a
.sa3sa
.sa3ti
.sa3uk3
.sa5ng8a
.sa5pa
.se3h
.se3ka
.se3sa
.se3ta
.se5l4a
.se5ngi
.se5ra
.se5tu
.sela5p
.seng8a
.setik5
.si3na
.si5n8i
.simbu5
.simbuk8
.so3t
.su3ka
.su3ki
.su3m4a
.su3ta
.su5n4a
.sut2
.ta3h4a
.ta3hi
.ta3m4a
.ta3r8a
.ta5ki.
.ta5na
.ta5ng8a
.ta5ri
.ta5usa
.tab3l
.takber8u
.tapa8k5
.tari8kan
.tasa5w
.te2r
.te3ka
.te3ki
.te3ma
.te5l4a
.te5nga
.te7r8an.
.te8rand
.te8ranga
.te8ratur
.tebu8k5
.teko5r
.teram6a
.ti1h
.ti3ba
.ti3ra
.ti3s
.ti5la
.ti5mi
.ti5ngi
.tik5an
.til4
.tir4
.to3ma
.to5la
.tol2
.tro3p8
.tu3hi
.tu3m4a
.tu3ni
.tu3p
.tu3r8i
.tu5a
.tu5n4a
.tu5ngi
.tu5ra
.tumbak8
.tumpu8k
.ua2
.ub4
.uba2
.uban5
.ubu4
.ubur3
.uga2
.uge4
.uja2
.ul2a
.ulak3
.ulam3
.um2a
.uma8n
.umi2
.undak5
.ung4a4
.ungap5
.ungga6
.up2
.up8a
.ura4
.ura8k5a
.ure5ta
.urit5
.usi2
.usik3
.ut2
.ut3r
.uta4
.utak3
.wa3h4a
.wa3hi
.wa3ni
.wa3sa
.wa3t2
.war8a
.we3t4
.wu5t
.ya3ki
.ya3ng
.yo5nga
.yu3d
.za3ir
.za3ma
1abn
1adeh
1adil
1adop
1ads
1adud
1adv
1afd
1agre
1ajo
1ajus
1ak8ib
1ali2h
1alie
1alko
1aneh
1ap3li
1aqs
1aspi
1asyi
1audi
1aumk
1auto
1awet
1ayom
1ejaw
1eksp
1ekui
1elue
1emi7g4
1enkr
1esae
1esok
1evak
1g4red
1geom
1gioe
1giog
1giol
1giop
1givi
1h2anu
1ha.
1ha1u
1haa
1hab
1haf
1hag
1haj
1hak
1hal
1ham
1hana
1hang
1hank
1hant
1hap
1har
1has
1hat
1hay
1he
1hi3f
1hia
1hib
1hid
1hih
1hij
1hik
1hil
1him
1hin
1hip
1hit
1hu
1i2bai
1ibub
1ijaz
1ijt
1ikht
1ilmi
1imaj
1impl
1inh
1inko
1inp
1insp
1inst
1inv
1ionk
1ip3ri
1isap
1k2o
1ka
1ke
1khaw
1khod
1ki
1lah
1lap
1lip
1lof
1lom
1los
1m2i
1m2o
1ma
1na
1ne
1ngaa
1ngai
1ngat
1ngic
1ngif
1ngih
1ngip
1ngiu
1ngiy
1ngoa
1ngoc
1ngoe
1ngof
1ngoh
1ngon
1ngoo
1ngos
1ngot
1ngov
1ngoy
1nguf
1nguh
1ngut
1nguy
1ni
1no
1ny
1o3rie
1obs
1ok1lu
1oku3p
1onsl
1org
1ovu
1qa
1qi
1ra
1re
1ri
1ro
1ru
1sa
1shal
1si
1so
1su
1sy
1t2o
1ta3t
1tab
1taj
1te
1ti
1tu
1uhj
1uki2r
1unif
1usea
1wa
1wi2n
1yuz
1ze
2a3no
2a3ny
2a3wi
2aci
2adal
2adas
2aeh
2ag8u2m
2akp
2alum
2amer
2ampa
2amu
2an5d
2ana
2ang
2anh
2ani
2ank
2anl
2anm
2anr
2ans
2ant
2anv
2asus
2awal
2awat
2b1b
2b1f
2b1g
2b1j
2b1m
2b1n
2b1v
2b1w
2b1y
2b1z
2b2h2
2b2r2
2b3p
2b3s4
2b3t
2b5k
2bl
2c2h
2d1b
2d1d
2d1g
2d1j
2d1k
2d1m
2d1t
2d1v
2d2r2
2d5l
2d5n2
2d5s4
2deal
2dw
2dy
2dz.
2e1c
2ed.
2egol
2ese
2evl
2f1b
2f1f
2f1h
2f1k
2f1m
2f1n
2f1s
2f1t
2f3d
2f3ri
2fru
2g1f
2g1h2
2g1t
2g1w
2g3j
2g3lia
2g3m
2g3n2
2g3ro
2g3uj
2g5b
2g5g4
2g5k4
2g5p
2g5y
2gohm
2h1c
2h1g
2h1ops
2h1p
2h1y
2h3f
2h3r
2h3s
2h5b
2h5k
2h5n
2h5t
2hart
2hi.
2hog
2huy
2i3le
2i3ne
2i3nge
2i3re
2i5ko
2ibe
2idu
2ifi
2ihe
2iji2
2ika
2ilan
2imo
2impu
2inah
2init
2iny
2ira
2iru
2ise
2isir
2isit
2isu
2itu
2j1b
2j1d
2j1j
2j1m
2j1n
2j1t
2j1w
2j4r
2jl
2k1c
2k1g4
2k1j
2k1n
2k1p
2k2r2
2k3b
2k5d
2kany
2ki.
2kism
2kl2
2korb
2l1c
2l1f
2l1ism
2l1j
2l1m2
2l1n
2l1q
2l1r
2l1v
2l1w
2l1y
2l3akh
2l3b
2l3ilm
2l3isl
2l3s4
2l3t
2l3z2
2l5d
2l5g2
2l5k
2l5l
2l5p
2labs
2ladm
2lalk
2lan
2lihd
2liht
2lokl
2luo
2m1an.
2m1d
2m1f
2m1j
2m1l
2m1r
2m1t
2m1w
2m3m
2m3p4
2m3s2
2m5n
2mism
2n1k
2n3b
2naca
2nan
2ng1op
2ng7em
2ngeg
2ngek
2ngen
2ngev
2ngey
2ngi.
2ngiv
2ngt
2nism
2o1o
2o5ba
2obok
2op.
2opek
2opy
2p1b
2p1c
2p1f
2p1g
2p1h2
2p1j
2p1m
2p1p
2p1s4
2p1y
2p1z
2p5k
2p5n
2pism
2pl2
2q1l
2r1abd
2r1akh
2r1c
2r1d
2r1etn
2r1f
2r1g4
2r1j
2r1n
2r1p
2r1w
2r1y
2r3h2
2r3m4
2r3r2
2r3s4
2r5l
2radu
2ran
2reu3
2rikl
2rins
2rism
2role
2ru3la
2ru3r
2s1f
2s1h
2s1ins
2s1k4
2s1l2
2s1n
2s1osm
2s1p4
2s1r
2s1s
2s1t4
2s1w
2s3b
2s3j
2s5g2
2s5m2
2s5v
2sagu
2san
2sinf
2sinh
2sinv
2sy.
2syk
2syr
2syt
2t1c
2t1d
2t1t
2t1v
2t1w
2t1y
2t2h2
2t2r2
2t3f
2t5j
2taf.
2tism
2u3ra.
2u3ray
2uda
2udos
2uhi
2uk3s4
2uka
2uke
2unom
2upi
2urea3
2usal
2usen
2usy
2ute
2uto
2uwo
2v1n
2v1r
2v1t
2v3s4
2vl
2w1r
2w1t
2w1y
2y1g
2y1j
2y1l
2y1s
2y1w
2y1y
2y3c
2z1b
2z1d
2z1h
2z1k
2z1m
2z1n
2z1t
2z1y
2z1z
3abadi
3abaik
3abena
3adeg
3akomo
3aksar
3alial
3aline
3ambis
3ambiy
3anali
3analo
3andam
3anglo
3aniay
3antep
3ap3ri
3apam
3apart
3apiap
3aplu
3apolo
3apote
3arihk
3asas.
3asask
3asimi
3asini
3asink
3askas
3asmar
3asram
3asums
3atapk
3atrib
3awale
3ayuna
3ayunk
3b2log
3b4rid.
3bag
3bah
3baj
3bak
3bal
3bat
3be.
3be2r7
3bei
3bic
3bik
3bo.
3boi
3bon
3bu
3d4ram
3da3t
3daa
3dah
3dal
3dar
3de
3dia
3dit
3efek.
3ejane
3ekono
3elabo
3elimi
3elite
3emosi
3empot
3emuls
3enape
3enask
3encel
3erotk
3esake
3estet
3estim
3f2ar
3f8is.
3fa.
3fab
3fad
3fag
3fah
3fak
3falo
3fas
3fat
3fay
3fen
3feri
3fero
3galon
3gelia
3genit
3gesta
3giosp
3grav
3gre.
3grum
3ha3r8i
3had
3hah
3hai5
3harm
3hed
3hop.
3hor
3hud
3i2dz
3i4saki
3ibada
3idola5
3ihr
3ik8ana
3ilust
3imbuh
3impii
3indag
3indiv
3indus
3inggr
3ingsu
3insy
3integ
3isei
3isola
3istil
3istim
3isu3k
3jo2k
3k2aa
3k2abu
3k2ar
3k2et
3k2ih
3k2lor
3k2u
3k4ana
3k4lami
3k4ola
3k4reo
3k6rid
3k8anb
3k8ane
3k8ant
3k8as.
3k8esu
3ka2ng
3ka2pa
3kaca.
3kah
3kai
3kal
3kamb
3kanc
3kao
3kap.
3kasa
3kat
3kau.
3kaw.
3kawa.
3keh
3kel
3kerj
3kes.
3key
3khay
3khi
3ki3g
3kias
3kid
3kil
3kim.
3kime
3king.
3kip
3kise
3kist
3kit
3kiu3
3klad
3kod
3koh
3kok
3kol.
3kom
3kon.
3kopa
3kos
3kot
3lac
3lan8i
3lanb
3land
3lang
3lans
3lanu
3lany
3leka
3lid
3lu.
3m2u
3m6aa
3m8ang
3m8ant
3m8rop
3m8rote
3mag
3mah
3mai
3mak
3mana
3manb
3manc
3mand
3mane
3manh
3mani
3manj
3mank
3manu
3many
3mar
3mas
3mat
3mau.
3maun
3mia
3mik
3min
3misi
3n2ane
3n2et
3n8ans
3n8ismi
3nad
3nago
3nam
3nana4
3nang
3nani
3nant
3nanz
3nap
3nga.
3nga2h
3ngak.
3ngal.
3ngam.
3ngank
3nganm
3ngapc
3ngarc
3ngard
3ngark
3ngas.
3ngase
3ngask
3ngawi
3ngegu
3ngeka
3ngeke
3ngeki
3ngekl
3ngeme
3ngemi
3ngena
3ngens
3ngevl
3ngi5la8
3ngia
3ngibl
3ngibu
3ngiji
3ngik.
3ngiki
3ngil.
3ngin.
3ngios
3ngir.
3ngis.
3ngisr
3ngit
3ngiw
3ngok.
3ngoka
3ngoko
3ngopi
3ngopr
3ngopy
3ngor.
3ngore
3ngort
3ngoru
3nguah
3nguak
3ngual
3nguas
3nguat
3nguci
3ngucu
3ngudi
3nguin
3nguit
3ngult
3ngunc
3nguni
3nguny
3ngupi
3ngurb
3ngure
3ngurs
3ngusr
3ngust
3nian
3nid
3nih
3nik
3nil
3nio
3nisma
3nismu
3no3l
3nok
3nom
3non
3nu
3nyu
3obj
3ogak
3ohm
3opaka
3oroko
3ortop
3oyako
3p2ane
3p2lon
3p8leks
3pa5a
3pa7ni
3pab
3pada.
3pah
3pai
3pal
3pam
3pand
3pang
3pank
3pano
3pany
3pas
3pat
3pau
3pay
3ped
3pek.
3pel
3pem
3pih
3pik
3pil
3pit
3plast
3plat
3poi
3pol
3pot
3prab
3praj
3prakt
3pram
3prib
3prig
3prih
3prod
3prot
3proy
3pu
3r2ai
3r8a1up
3r8aba.
3r8aji
3r8aju.
3r8akb
3r8ali.
3r8alik
3r8amk
3r8ampo
3r8ani
3r8ank
3r8ano
3r8ariu
3r8aso.
3r8asul
3r8ayap
3r8azi
3r8ede
3r8ekb
3r8ekr
3r8elu
3r8emba
3r8enan
3r8enca
3r8enj
3r8ente
3r8esb
3r8esp
3r8igi
3r8ih.
3r8ika.
3r8ima.
3r8impa
3r8ingg
3r8otas
3r8uam
3r8uan.
3r8uay
3r8umi
3r8una
3r8ungu
3r8upa.
3r8upar
3r8uri.
3r8usa4k3
3rabak
3rah
3rajam
3rajan
3rakot
3rampi
3ranci
3ranh
3ranp
3ranye
3rasuk
3rawar
3raweh
3rayu.
3re3f4
3re5ngu
3reb
3reda.
3redam
3redup
3reg
3rekom
3relie
3rendo
3renen
3rengb
3rengo
3reny
3reo
3rer.
3resah
3resap
3resol
3restr
3retr
3revi
3rew
3ribur
3ric
3riea
3rigu
3ringb
3rinil
3rito
3riuj
3roc
3roga.
3ror.
3rore
3roris
3rotr
3row
3rubu
3rucu
3rug
3ruju.
3rujul
3rumba8
3rumbu
3rups
3rusk
3rusm
3rusn
3rusu.
3ruti
3ruw
3ry.
3s2ap
3s2pes
3s2tab
3s4as
3s4tire
3s4tud
3s8ang
3s8kop.
3saa
3sab
3saf
3sai
3saj
3sak
3sal
3sandi
3sani
3sank
3sano
3sany
3saq
3sat
3saw
3se
3sid
3so.
3sob
3sof
3sol
3som
3staf.
3stilo
3sya
3syi
3syu
3t2aa
3t2ane
3t4rai
3t4ram
3t4rij
3t4risa
3t8anr
3t8raga
3t8rus
3ta2i3
3ta2u
3tac
3tad
3tae
3taf
3tagl
3tah
3tal
3tam
3tana
3tang
3tani
3tanj
3tank
3tano
3tanu
3tany
3tap
3tar
3tas
3tav
3taw
3teo
3tere
3tes
3tet
3teu
3thu
3tia
3tik
3tin.
3tina
3tir
3tiu
3to.
3tod
3tokr
3tomi
3tos
3tul
3tum
3ubu2b1
3ucap
3uceku
3udek
3udosk
3ui2su
3uik3u
3ulitu
3umpam
3umum
3unduh
3until
3upac
3upah
3upam3
3upay
3urisu
3urusi
3usai
3usang
3usap
3ver
3wen
3wu
4acar.
4adah
4adi.
4adim
4ahe
4ahu
4akok
4ambak
4anjan
4anji
4anog
4arse1
4atasi
4awar
4b5d
4bakr
4d1p
4dav
4esa2n
4g3d
4h1l
4h1m2
4idal
4idi.
4ima.
4imbah
4ime
4impa
4inc
4inia
4inik
4inol
4k1ahl
4k1s
4k3rol
4k3t
4k5k
4k5m
4k5ra.
4kalam
4kangd
4karif
4koro
4kud.
4kund
4l1an.
4l3h2
4laj
4lence
4m3b4
4m5k
4maraf
4mare
4minf
4n1an.
4n1s4
4n3inte
4n3t4
4n8gino
4nalo
4ng.
4ng1ad
4ng3iak
4ngau
4ngece
4ngeda
4ngedi
4ngej
4ngere
4ngert
4ngeso
4ngest
4ngg
4ngiap
4ngici
4ngiht
4ngod
4ngom
4ngong
4ngulu
4olek
4onisa
4osid
4otis
4p1d
4p3rel
4p3rep
4p3t
4p7rek
4plah
4pso
4r1b
4r3asap3
4r3asin
4r3asur
4r3edar
4r3k2
4r3t
4r3umpa
4r3usah
4ra3pr
4rabua
4ragih
